District of Columbia statutes.
50-1212

Recordation fee.

The fee for recording liens or assignments of liens upon a certificate shall be the sum of $20 for each lien or assignment of lien on each motor vehicle or trailer contained in the instrument, which fee shall include the charge for recording the release of such lien. The District of Columbia Government shall not be required to pay the fee established in this section.

History

July 2, 1940, 54 Stat. 739, ch. 527, § 12
Dec. 15, 1945, 59 Stat. 610, ch. 578
June 19, 1948, 62 Stat. 493, ch. 522, § 1
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-30, § 6, 38 DCR 4215
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1703, 49 DCR 11664
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 201(g), 54 DCR 903

Cross References

Recorder of deeds, fee rate adjustments, see § 42-1218.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-1218 and § 50-1213.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1012.
1973 Ed., § 40-712.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-307 substituted “$20” for “$15”.
D.C. Law 16-279 added the sentence: “The District of Columbia Government shall not be required to pay the fee established in this section.”

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 110 of Omnibus Budget Support Temporary Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-19, June 21, 1991, law notification 38 DCR 5786).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1703 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1703 of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1703 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).